District of Columbia statutes.
21-565

Statement of release and adjudication procedures and of other rights.

Upon the admission of a person to a hospital under a provision of this chapter, the administrator shall deliver to him, and to his spouse, domestic partner, parents, or other nearest known adult relative, a written statement outlining in simple, nontechnical language all release procedures provided by this chapter, setting out all rights accorded to patients by this chapter, and describing procedures provided by law for adjudication of incompetency and appointment of trustees or committees for the hospitalized person.

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 759, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
Sept. 12, 2008, D.C. Law 17-231, § 22(e), 55 DCR 6758
1981 Ed., § 21-565.
1973 Ed., § 21-565.
D.C. Law 17-231 substituted “spouse, domestic partner” for “spouse”.